Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.100

Confinement without food and water—Intervention by others.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1149-S.SL) ***

If any domestic animal is impounded or confined without necessary food and water for more than thirty-six consecutive hours, any person may, from time to time, as is necessary, enter into and open any pound or place of confinement in which any domestic animal is confined, and supply it with necessary food and water so long as it is confined. The person shall not be liable to action for the entry, and may collect from the animal's owner the reasonable cost of the food and water. The animal shall be subject to attachment for the costs and shall not be exempt from levy and sale upon execution issued upon a judgment. If an investigating officer finds it extremely difficult to supply confined animals with food and water, the officer may remove the animals to protective custody for that purpose.

[ 1994 c 261 s 10; 1982 c 114 s 6; 1901 c 146 s 12; RRS s 3195.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.